Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.070

Reductions for good behavior.

(1) Every prisoner, convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984, who has a favorable record of conduct at a state correctional institution, and who performs in a faithful, diligent, industrious, orderly and peaceable manner the work, duties, and tasks assigned to him or her to the satisfaction of the superintendent of the institution, and in whose behalf the superintendent of the institution files a report certifying that his or her conduct and work have been meritorious and recommending allowance of time credits to him or her, shall upon, but not until, the adoption of such recommendation by the indeterminate sentence review board, be allowed time credit reductions from the term of imprisonment fixed by the board.

(2) Offenders sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507 for a crime committed on or after September 1, 2001, are subject to the earned release provisions for sex offenders established in RCW 9.94A.728.

[ 2009 c 28 s 24; 2003 c 218 s 4; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 327; 1999 c 143 s 19; 1955 c 133 s 8. Prior: 1947 c 92 s 1, part; 1935 c 114 s 2, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 10249-2, part.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 28: See note following RCW 2.24.040.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.